District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2026

Penalties.

Repealed.

June 7, 1938, 52 Stat. 619, ch. 321, § 26
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 452, 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-245, § 38(b), 40 DCR 660
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1236, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-926.
1973 Ed., § 2-1326.

Prior Codifications

Repeal of Law 9-245

See note to § 3-2001.

Repeal of Law